District of Columbia statutes.
47-310.02

Schedule and notice requirement for completion of Comprehensive Annual Financial Report.

Each year in connection with preparation of the February 1 financial statement and report for the preceding fiscal year required under § 47-310(a)(4), the Chief Financial Officer shall prepare an audit plan which establishes a schedule of tasks that must be completed to meet the February 1 submission deadline. The schedule shall be transmitted to the Council and the Office of the Inspector General in writing annually before August 16. If a task is not completed when scheduled, the Chief Financial Officer shall notify the Council and the Office of the Inspector General and provide a written explanation for the failure to complete the task, within 5 calendar days of the scheduled date.

Apr. 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-253, § 2(b), 48 DCR 678